Hawaii statutes.
§183D-28 Hunter education program.
(a) The department shall establish a hunter education program to provide
instruction in hunter safety, principles of conservation, and sportsmanship.
Upon successful completion of the program, the department shall issue to the
graduate a hunter education certificate which shall be valid for the life of
the person. This certification shall be rescinded by judicial action upon the
conviction of a wildlife and/or firearms violation. No person shall be
eligible for a hunting license unless the person possesses a valid hunter
education certificate or meets the requirements for exemption provided in
subsection (b)(2), and is either:

(1) Born after December 31, 1971; or

(2) Born before January 1, 1972, and has never
been issued a hunting license in the State.

(b) A person who meets the minimum age
requirements adopted pursuant to subsection (c) shall be exempt from the
requirements of subsection (a) if the person:

(1) Was born before January 1, 1972, and at one time
possessed a hunting license issued by the State; provided that the person shows
satisfactory proof to the department that the person had possessed the hunting
license;

(2) Has successfully completed a course or program of
hunter education and safety that is approved by the International Hunter
Education Association and meets the requirements of Chapter 12 of the United
States Fish and Wildlife Service Federal Aid Manual, as revised; provided that
the person shows satisfactory proof in the form of a certificate, wallet card,
or other document issued by a state, province, or country evidencing successful
completion of the course or program; or

(3) Obtains a three-day or a seven-day hunting
license pursuant to section 183D-22(b)(3) to hunt on a private and commercial
shooting preserve, accompanied by a hunting guide licensed pursuant to section
183D-25.5; provided that:

(A) All hunting shall be conducted on a
licensed private and commercial shooting preserve and under the direction of a
hunting guide who has successfully completed a Hawaii hunter education
certification course and meets the requirements of section 183D-25.5;

(B) Prior to licensing, a hunter safety class
and field training session shall be provided to the licensee that includes
hunter safety and hunting equipment use and safe discharge;

(C) While hunting under these provisions, a
hunting guide shall guide not more than two unaccompanied clients at any time
while hunting;

(D) All hunting guides and clients shall wear
a hunter safety blaze-orange outer garment while hunting;

(E) The private and commercial shooting
preserve operator, hunting guides, and clients agree to be subject to
inspection while engaged in hunting activities by department representatives or
authorized law enforcement officers; and

(F) The private and commercial shooting
preserve owner and operator assume responsibility and liability for public and
hunter safety while operating under these provisions and agree to report any
injuries to the department.

Upon application and satisfaction of the
requirements of paragraph (1), the department shall issue a written exemption
that shall be valid for the life of the person. The department shall develop
and maintain a list of approved hunter education courses described in paragraph
(2) for reference by the public and license agents.

(c) The department, by rules adopted pursuant
to chapter 91, shall establish minimum age requirements for issuance of the
hunter education certificate, or the exemption therefrom, required to obtain a hunting
license pursuant to section 183D-22(a)(3).

(d) The department may establish a hunter
education officer position to administer the program, outline all phases of
instruction, conduct general supervision of individual programs, and distribute
information on the program, or may contract the program to a qualified
organization.

(e) The department may construct, operate, and
maintain public outdoor and indoor target ranges for the program.

(f) The department shall prepare reports as
may be necessary to seek approval under Public Law 91-503 for federal
assistance in this program of hunter safety, conservation, and sportsmanship. [L
1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1989, c 96, §2; am L 1991, c 176, §1; am L 1992, c
127, §2; am L 1999, c 224, §2; am L 2007, c 129, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next